src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronoun inflection
! ----------------------
!! The Lushootseed language pronouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator.

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG1
+Pers+Sg1+Nom:   #  ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2
+Pers+Sg2+Nom:   #  ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3
+Pers+Sg3+Nom:   #  ;

LEXICON	PRON-PERS-PL1
+Pers+Pl1+Nom:   #  ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL2
+Pers+Pl2+Nom:   #  ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL3
+Pers+Pl3+Nom:   #  ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_
+Interr: K ;

!LEXICON PRON-DEM_
!+Dem: K ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-MSC_
+Dem+Msc: K ;
LEXICON PRON-DEM-MSC-PROX_
+Dem+Msc+Prox: K ;
LEXICON PRON-DEM-MSC-DIST_
+Dem+Msc+Dist: K ;
LEXICON PRON-DEM-MSC-REM_
+Dem+Msc+Rem: K ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-FEM_
+Dem+Fem: K ;
LEXICON PRON-DEM-FEM-PROX_
+Dem+Fem+Prox: K ;
LEXICON PRON-DEM-FEM-DIST_
+Dem+Fem+Dist: K ;
LEXICON PRON-DEM-FEM-REM_
+Dem+Fem+Rem: K ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
